external/rhvoice/src/scripts/Spanish/include/feats/currency.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# proposal: Currency support with documentation. Maybe a new token type? Because we discovered some inconsistencies when we include these date and currency rules in number processing (numbers.foma)
# Original script from Italian. Adaptation to Spanish from the same autor, Mateo Cedillo.
# Separator handling and numbers.
define DollarSign %$ ; 
define eur %€ ; 
define separator %. ; 
define Nums %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define CentFormat Nums < 3 ; # Cents must be less than 100, 1 to 99.
# We will translate currency to a human currency interpreter.
define TranslateCurrency 
# When it is a one dollar.
DollarSign 1 @-> ... dólar || .#. _ separator Nums, .#. _ .#. ,, # The seccond rule is applied when the input as just $1.
eur 1 @-> ... euro || .#. _ separator Nums, .#. _ .#. ,, 
# When it is more than 1 dollars.
Nums* @-> ... dólares || .#. DollarSign _ separator Nums, .#. DollarSign _ .#. ,, # The seccond rule is applied when the input as just a number inside dollar withouth cents, example: $9.
Nums* @-> ... euros || .#. eur _ separator Nums, .#. eur _ .#. ,, 
# When it is one cent.
separator [1|%0 1] @-> ... centavo || DollarSign Nums* _ ,, 
separator [1|%0 1] @-> ... céntimo || eur Nums* _ ,, 
# 2 or more cents.
Nums* @-> ... centavos || DollarSign Nums* separator _ ,, 
Nums* @-> ... céntimos || eur Nums* separator _ ,, 
# Removal of dollars with a zero at the start. That means, this should be interpreted as cents only.
DollarSign %0 separator @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums* ,, 
eur %0 separator @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums* ; 

define RemoveDollar 
# Removing original dollar sign from the input at start, because we already have the needed translation and we wont to be in output.
DollarSign @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums* [dólar|dólares] separator Nums* [centavo|centavos], .#. _ Nums* [dólar|dólares] .#. ,, 
eur @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums* [euro|euros] separator Nums* [céntimo|céntimos], .#. _ Nums* [euro|euros] .#. ; 

define TranslateSeparator 
# Example. due dollari è tre centesimi. The point separator is now "è" in these cases. As alwais, we follow the currency format.
separator @-> con || .#. Nums* [dólar|dólares] _ Nums* [centavo|centavos] ,, 
separator @-> con || .#. Nums* [euro|euros] _ Nums* [céntimo|céntimos] ; 

define RemoveZeros 
# Remove zeros anywhere.
%0 @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums [centavo|centavos] , .#. Nums* [dólar|dólares] con _ Nums [centavo|centavos] ,, 
%0 @-> 0 || .#. _ Nums [céntimo|céntimos] , .#. Nums* [euro|euros] con _ Nums [céntimo|céntimos] ; 

define PluralToSingular 
1 @-> un || .#. _ dólar , con _ centavo , .#. _ euro , con _ céntimo ; 

define Currency 
TranslateCurrency .o. 
RemoveDollar .o. 
TranslateSeparator .o. 
RemoveZeros .o. 
PluralToSingular ; 

regex Currency ; 
